New York, session 2025-2026, S2344.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. 1. Dissolution of the New York state thruway authority. The 2 New York state thruway authority is hereby dissolved and discontinued, 3 and all functions, duties, debts, and obligations are hereby transferred 4 to the department of transportation in accordance with the provisions of 5 this act. 6 2. Transfer of functions. All of the functions and powers possessed 7 by, and all of the obligations and duties of the New York state thruway 8 authority are transferred and assigned to, assumed by and devolved upon 9 the department of transportation, in accordance with and pursuant to the 10 provisions of this act. 11 3. Transfer of employees. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 12 rule, or regulation to the contrary, upon the transfer of functions from 13 the New York state thruway authority pursuant to this act, all employees EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05551-01-5 S. 2344 2 1 of the New York state thruway authority shall be transferred to the 2 department of transportation. Employees transferred pursuant to this 3 section shall be transferred without further examination or qualifica- 4 tion and shall retain their respective civil service classifications, 5 status and collective bargaining unit designations and collective 6 bargaining agreements. 7 4. Transfer of records. All books, papers, and property of the New 8 York state thruway authority shall be provided to and deemed to be in 9 the possession of the department of transportation. 10 5. Continuity of authority. For the purpose of succession of all func- 11 tions, powers, duties and obligations transferred and assigned to, 12 devolved upon and assumed by it pursuant to this act, the department of 13 transportation shall be deemed and held to constitute the continuation 14 of the New York state thruway authority. 15 6. Completion of unfinished business. Any business or other matter 16 undertaken or commenced by the New York state thruway authority pertain- 17 ing to or connected with the functions, powers, obligations and duties 18 hereby transferred and assigned to the department of transportation and 19 pending on the effective date of this act, may be conducted and 20 completed by the department of transportation in the same manner and 21 under the same terms and conditions and with the same effect as if 22 conducted and completed by the New York state thruway authority. 23 7. Continuation of rules and regulations. All rules, regulations, 24 acts, orders, determinations, and decisions of the New York state thru- 25 way authority pertaining to the functions and powers transferred and 26 assigned pursuant to this act, in force at the time of such transfer and 27 assumption, shall continue in full force and effect as rules, regu- 28 lations, acts, orders, determinations and decisions of the department of 29 transportation until duly modified or abrogated by such department. 30 8. Terms occurring in laws, contracts and other documents. Whenever 31 the New York state thruway authority, or the board thereof, is referred 32 to or designated in any contract or document pertaining to the func- 33 tions, powers, obligations and duties hereby transferred to and assigned 34 to the department of transportation, such reference or designation shall 35 be deemed to refer to the department of transportation. 36 9. Existing rights and remedies preserved. No existing right or remedy 37 of any character shall be lost, impaired or affected by any provisions 38 of this act. 39 10. Pending actions and proceedings. No action or proceeding pending 40 at the time when this act shall take effect, brought by or against the 41 New York state thruway authority, or the board thereof, shall be 42 affected by any provision of this act, but the same may be prosecuted or 43 defended in the name of the department of transportation. In all such 44 actions and proceedings, the department of transportation, upon applica- 45 tion of the court, shall be substituted as a party. 46 11. Transfer of assets and liabilities. All assets and liabilities of 47 the New York state thruway authority are hereby transferred to and 48 assumed by the department of transportation. 49 § 2. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 of section 103 of the banking law, 50 as amended by chapter 227 of the laws of 2013, is amended to read as 51 follows: 52 (c) Loans (exclusive of any loan described in paragraph (a) of this 53 subdivision) to any state other than the state of New York, or to any 54 foreign nation, [the New York State thruway authority,] the Triborough 55 bridge and tunnel authority, The Port of New York Authority, a railroad 56 corporation, a municipal corporation of this state, a corporation S. 2344 3 1 subject to the jurisdiction of a public service commission of this 2 state, or any international lending facility or public benefit corpo- 3 ration designated by the superintendent by regulation, may equal but not 4 exceed twenty-five per centum of the capital stock, surplus fund and 5 undivided profits of such bank or trust company. 6 § 3. Subdivision 24 of section 2 of the canal law, as added by section 7 14 of part TT of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, is amended to read as 8 follows: 9 24. "[Thruway] Former thruway authority" shall mean the former New 10 York state thruway authority, a body corporate and politic formerly 11 constituting a public corporation created and constituted pursuant to 12 the former title nine of article two of the public authorities law. 13 § 4. Section 5 of the canal law, as amended by section 16 of part TT 14 of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, is amended to read as follows: 15 § 5. Transfer of powers and duties relating to canals and canal lands 16 to the power authority of the state of New York. The powers and duties 17 of the former thruway authority relating to the New York state canal 18 system as set forth in articles one through and including fourteen, 19 except article seven, of this chapter, and except properties in use on 20 the effective date of this article in support of highway maintenance, 21 equipment management and traffic signal operations of the department of 22 transportation, heretofore transferred by the commissioner of transpor- 23 tation to the former thruway authority, are hereby transferred to and 24 merged with the authority, to be exercised by the authority directly or 25 through the canal corporation on behalf of the people of the state of 26 New York. In addition, the commissioner of transportation and the chair 27 of the authority or [his or her] their designee may, in their 28 discretion, enter into an agreement or agreements transferring the 29 powers and duties of the commissioner of transportation relating to any 30 or all of the bridges and highways as set forth in article seven of this 31 chapter, to be exercised by the authority directly or through the canal 32 corporation on behalf of the people of the state of New York, and, as 33 determined to be feasible and advisable by the authority's trustees, 34 shall enter into an agreement or agreements directly or through the 35 canal corporation for the financing, construction, reconstruction or 36 improvement of lift and movable bridges on the canal system. Such powers 37 shall be in addition to other powers enumerated in title one of article 38 five of the public authorities law. All of the provisions of title one 39 of article five of such law which are not inconsistent with this chapter 40 shall apply to the actions and duties of the authority pursuant to this 41 chapter. The authority shall be deemed to be the state in exercising the 42 powers and duties transferred pursuant to this section but for no other 43 purposes. 44 § 5. Section 6 of the canal law, as added by chapter 766 of the laws 45 of 1992, and subdivisions 1, 2, 3, 4 and 5 as amended by section 17, and 46 subdivision 6 as amended and paragraphs (c) and (d) of subdivision 6 and 47 subdivision 7 as added by section 18 of part TT of chapter 54 of the 48 laws of 2016, is amended to read as follows: 49 § 6. Transfer of canal lands and other assets. 1. The jurisdiction of 50 the former thruway authority over the New York state canal system and 51 over all state assets, equipment and property, both tangible and intan- 52 gible, owned or used in connection with the planning, development, 53 construction, reconstruction, maintenance and operation of the New York 54 state canal system, as set forth in articles one through and including 55 fourteen, except article seven, of this chapter, and except properties 56 in use on the effective date of this article in support of highway main- S. 2344 4 1 tenance, equipment management and traffic signal operations of the 2 department of transportation, heretofore transferred by the commissioner 3 of transportation to the former thruway authority, are hereby trans- 4 ferred without consideration to the authority, to be held by the author- 5 ity in the name of the people of the state of New York. In addition the 6 commissioner of transportation and the chair of the authority or [his or 7 her] such commissioner's or chair's designee may, in their discretion, 8 enter into an agreement or agreements transferring jurisdiction over any 9 or all of the bridges and highways set forth in article seven of this 10 chapter, and any or all state assets, equipment and property, both 11 tangible and intangible, owned or used in connection with the planning, 12 development, construction, reconstruction, maintenance and operation of 13 such bridges and highways, which shall be transferred without consider- 14 ation to the authority, to be held by the authority through the corpo- 15 ration in the name of the people of the state of New York. Any other 16 rights and obligations resulting from or arising out of the planning, 17 development, construction, reconstruction, operation or maintenance of 18 the New York state canal system shall be deemed assigned to and shall be 19 exercised by the authority through the corporation[, except that the 20 authority may designate the chair of the thruway authority to be its 21 agent for the operation and maintenance of the New York state canal 22 system, provided that such designation shall have no force or effect 23 after January first, two thousand seventeen]. Such canal system shall 24 remain the property of the state and under its management and control as 25 exercised by and through the authority, through the corporation which 26 shall be deemed to be the state for the purposes of such management and 27 control of the canals but for no other purposes. 28 2. The department of transportation [and thruway authority] shall 29 deliver to the authority all books, policies, procedures, papers, plans, 30 maps, records, equipment and property of such department pertaining to 31 the functions transferred pursuant to this article. 32 3. All rules, regulations, acts, determinations, orders and decisions 33 of the commissioner of transportation, department of transportation, or 34 former thruway authority pertaining to the functions transferred pursu- 35 ant to this article in force at the time of such transfer shall continue 36 in force and effect as rules, regulations, acts, determinations, orders 37 and decisions of the authority and corporation until duly modified or 38 abrogated by such authority or corporation. 39 4. Any business or other matters undertaken or commenced by the former 40 thruway authority, including executed contracts, permits and other 41 agreements, but excluding bonds, notes or other evidences of indebt- 42 edness, pertaining to or connected with the powers, duties and obli- 43 gations transferred pursuant to this article, and in effect on the 44 effective date of the transfer of such matters from the former thruway 45 authority to the authority provided for in this article, shall, except 46 as otherwise agreed by the authority and the former thruway authority, 47 be conducted and completed by the authority through the corporation in 48 the same manner and under the same terms and conditions and with the 49 same effect as if conducted and completed by the former thruway authori- 50 ty, provided that nothing in this subdivision shall be deemed to require 51 the authority to take any action in a manner that would in its judgment 52 be inconsistent with the provisions of any bond or note resolution or 53 any other contract with the holders of the authority's bonds, notes or 54 other obligations. S. 2344 5 1 5. No existing rights or remedies of the state, authority, [thruway 2 authority,] or canal corporation shall be lost, impaired or affected by 3 reason of this article. 4 [6. (a) No action or proceeding pending on the effective date of the 5 transfer of powers, duties and obligations from the thruway authority to 6 the authority brought by or against the thruway authority, the commis- 7 sioner of transportation, the corporation, the department of transporta- 8 tion or the authority shall be affected by this article. Any liability 9 arising out of any act or omission occurring prior to the effective date 10 of the transfer of the powers, duties and obligations from the thruway 11 authority to the authority, of the officers, employees or agents of the 12 thruway authority, the department of transportation, or any other agency 13 of the state, other than the authority, in the performance of their 14 obligations or duties under the canal law, any other law of the state or 15 any federal law, or pursuant to a contract entered into prior to the 16 effective date of such transfer, shall remain a liability of the thruway 17 authority, the department of transportation or such other agency of the 18 state and not of the authority. 19 (b) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in para- 20 graph (a) of this subdivision, the state shall indemnify and hold harm- 21 less the thruway authority, the corporation and the authority for any 22 and all claims, damages, or liabilities, whether or not caused by negli- 23 gence, including civil and criminal fines, arising out of or relating to 24 any generation, processing, handling, transportation, storage, treat- 25 ment, or disposal of solid or hazardous wastes in the canal system by 26 any person or entity other than the thruway authority or the authority 27 occurring prior to August third, nineteen hundred ninety-two. Such 28 indemnification shall extend to, without limitation, any releases into 29 land, water or air, including but not limited to releases as defined 30 under the federal comprehensive environmental response compensation and 31 liability act of nineteen hundred eighty, occurring or existing prior to 32 August third, nineteen hundred ninety-two; provided that the thruway 33 authority, the corporation and the authority shall cooperate in the 34 investigation and remediation of hazardous waste and other environmental 35 problems. 36 (c) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in para- 37 graph (a) of this subdivision, the thruway authority shall indemnify and 38 hold harmless the corporation and the authority for any and all claims, 39 damages, or liabilities, whether or not caused by negligence, including 40 civil and criminal fines, arising out of or relating to any generation, 41 processing, handling, transportation, storage, treatment, or disposal of 42 solid or hazardous wastes in the canal system by any person or entity 43 other than the authority occurring after August third, nineteen hundred 44 ninety-two and no later than the effective date of the transfer of 45 powers, duties and obligations from the thruway authority to the author- 46 ity. Such indemnification shall extend to, without limitation, any 47 releases into land, water or air, including but not limited to releases 48 as defined under the federal comprehensive environmental response 49 compensation and liability act of nineteen hundred eighty, occurring or 50 existing prior to the effective date of the transfer of powers, duties 51 and obligations from the thruway authority to the authority; provided 52 that the corporation and the authority shall cooperate in the investi- 53 gation and remediation of hazardous waste and other environmental prob- 54 lems. 55 (d) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the thruway authori- 56 ty shall retain all liabilities, whether or not caused by negligence, S. 2344 6 1 arising out of any acts or omissions occurring on or after August third, 2 nineteen hundred ninety-two, in connection with its powers, duties and 3 obligations with respect to the corporation. The authority and the state 4 shall not be held liable in connection with any liabilities arising out 5 of such acts or omissions. 6 7. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in connection 7 with the transfer of jurisdiction of the corporation to the authority 8 and the assumption of management of the corporation as a subsidiary 9 corporation of the authority pursuant to the chapter of the laws of two 10 thousand sixteen which added this subdivision, the thruway authority 11 shall have the power to fulfill any existing agreements or obligations, 12 make any agreements, receive, retain or pay any funds, deemed necessary 13 and in the public interest to effectuate the provisions and intent of 14 this chapter, including but not limited to, the entering into any agree- 15 ments with the corporation, the authority and any other federal, state, 16 municipal or other entities, and to receive funds from the federal emer- 17 gency management agency or the state, to fulfill the thruway authority's 18 existing financial or other obligations arising from its jurisdiction 19 over the canal system and the corporation.] 20 § 6. Paragraph 2 of subdivision (a) of section 168 of the economic 21 development law, as amended by chapter 33 of the laws of 2006, is 22 amended to read as follows: 23 (2) the [chairman] chairperson or [his or her] such chairperson's 24 designated representative of the [New York state thruway authority, the] 25 New York power authority, and the tourism advisory council, the New York 26 state council on the arts, the canal corporation, the canal recreation- 27 way commission, the Olympic regional development authority, and the 28 Hudson River park trust; 29 § 7. Paragraph (ii) of subdivision a of section 11 of the court of 30 claims act, as amended by chapter 439 of the laws of 1999, is amended to 31 read as follows: 32 (ii) In any action brought in the court of claims against the [New 33 York state thruway authority, the] city university of New York[,] or the 34 New York state power authority, a copy of the claim shall be served 35 personally or by certified mail, return receipt requested, upon such 36 defendant, in addition to the attorney general, within the times 37 hereinbefore provided for filing with the clerk of the court, and any 38 notice of intention shall be served personally or by certified mail, 39 return receipt requested, upon such defendant, in addition to the attor- 40 ney general, within the times hereinbefore provided for service upon the 41 attorney general. Service by certified mail, return receipt requested, 42 shall not be complete until the claim or notice of intention is received 43 by the defendant. Personal service upon any defendant shall be made in 44 the same manner as described in the civil practice law and rules. 45 § 8. Paragraph d of subdivision 5 of section 3-0311 of the environ- 46 mental conservation law, as amended by chapter 741 of the laws of 1991, 47 is amended to read as follows: 48 d. Albany Port District Commission, Battery Park City Authority, Capi- 49 tal District Transportation Authority, Central New York Regional Trans- 50 portation Authority, Dormitory Authority of the State of New York, 51 Facilities Development Corporation, Metropolitan Transportation Authori- 52 ty (including the operations of all of its operating units), New York 53 State Energy Research and Development Authority, New York State Environ- 54 mental Facilities Corporation, New York State Olympic Regional Develop- 55 ment Authority, [New York State Thruway Authority,] New York State Urban 56 Development Corporation, Niagara Frontier Transportation Authority, S. 2344 7 1 Ogdensburg Bridge and Port Authority, Port Authority of New York and New 2 Jersey, Port of Oswego Authority, Power Authority of the State of New 3 York, Rochester-Genesee Regional Transportation Authority; and 4 § 9. Subdivision 2 of section 6-0103 of the environmental conservation 5 law, as added by chapter 433 of the laws of 2010, is amended to read as 6 follows: 7 2. "State infrastructure agency" shall mean the department, the 8 department of transportation, the department of education, the depart- 9 ment of health, the department of state, the New York state environ- 10 mental facilities corporation, the New York state housing finance agen- 11 cy, the housing trust fund corporation, the dormitory authority, [the 12 thruway authority,] the port authority of New York and New Jersey, the 13 empire state development corporation, the New York state urban develop- 14 ment corporation and all other New York authorities. Any subsidiary of, 15 or corporation with the same members or directors as, a public benefit 16 corporation identified in this subdivision shall also be deemed to be 17 within the definition of state infrastructure agency under this article. 18 § 10. Subdivision 1 of section 9-1705 of the environmental conserva- 19 tion law, as added by chapter 674 of the laws of 2007, is amended to 20 read as follows: 21 1. There is hereby established the New York invasive species council. 22 Such council shall consist of a total of [nine] eight members and shall 23 include the commissioner, the commissioners of agriculture and markets, 24 transportation, parks, recreation and historic preservation, education, 25 the secretary of state, [the chairperson of the New York state thruway 26 authority,] the director of the New York state canal corporation, and 27 the chairperson of the Adirondack Park agency, or a designee of such 28 department, agency or public authority. 29 § 11. Paragraph b of subdivision 1 and subdivision 2 of section 30 19-0320 of the environmental conservation law, as added by chapter 621 31 of the laws of 1998, are amended to read as follows: 32 b. "Roadside program" means a roadside examination program conducted 33 pursuant to the heavy duty vehicle emissions reduction act for the 34 inspection of emissions and emission control equipment, at any public or 35 quasi-public location as designated by the commissioner of transporta- 36 tion with the concurrence of the department [and, where appropriate, the 37 New York state thruway authority]. 38 2. The department, jointly with the departments of motor vehicles and 39 transportation, shall develop a program for the inspection of emissions 40 from heavy duty vehicles. Such inspection program shall consist of an 41 annual inspection program and a roadside program. The annual inspection 42 program developed in accordance with this section shall be limited to 43 heavy duty vehicles registered or required to be registered in counties 44 in the state designated as being in serious, severe or extreme non-at- 45 tainment of the National Ambient Air Quality Standard for ozone pursuant 46 to the 1990 amendments of the federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. 7511). 47 Under no circumstances shall such program require heavy duty vehicles to 48 meet emission standards more stringent than the new vehicle emission 49 standards to which such vehicles were certified pursuant to the federal 50 Clean Air Act. The department shall, with the department of transporta- 51 tion [and, where appropriate, the New York state thruway authority], 52 jointly develop criteria for roadside program site selection and proce- 53 dures for the control of traffic and operation of such sites. 54 § 12. Subdivision 2 of section 27-1903 of the environmental conserva- 55 tion law, as added by section 3 of part V1 of chapter 62 of the laws of 56 2003, is amended to read as follows: S. 2344 8 1 2. State government must make an essential contribution to the devel- 2 opment and implementation of environmentally, economically and techni- 3 cally viable waste tire management programs. The department shall coop- 4 erate with other state agencies, including the department of economic 5 development, New York state energy research and development authority, 6 the department of transportation, [the New York state thruway authority] 7 and the department of health, to ensure that waste tires are effectively 8 managed and used in environmentally acceptable ways consistent with the 9 purposes of this chapter. 10 § 13. Paragraph (d) of subdivision 2 of section 37-0301 of the envi- 11 ronmental conservation law, as added by chapter 663 of the laws of 1994, 12 is amended to read as follows: 13 (d) dormitory authority of the state of New York, facilities develop- 14 ment corporation, metropolitan transportation authority (including the 15 operations of all of its operating units), New York state energy 16 research and development authority, New York state environmental facili- 17 ties corporation, New York state olympic regional development authority, 18 [New York state thruway authority,] New York state urban development 19 corporation, port authority of New York and New Jersey, and power 20 authority of the state of New York. 21 § 14. Subdivision 1 of section 21 of the executive law, as amended by 22 chapter 699 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 23 1. There is hereby created in the executive department a disaster 24 preparedness commission consisting of the commissioners of transporta- 25 tion, health, division of criminal justice services, education, economic 26 development, agriculture and markets, housing and community renewal, 27 general services, labor, environmental conservation, mental health, 28 addiction services and supports, parks, recreation and historic preser- 29 vation, corrections and community supervision, children and family 30 services, homeland security and emergency services, and people with 31 developmental disabilities, the president of the New York state energy 32 research and development authority, the superintendents of state police 33 and financial services, the secretary of state, the state fire adminis- 34 trator, the chair of the public service commission, the adjutant gener- 35 al, the office of information technology services, and the office of 36 victim services, the chairs of [the thruway authority,] the office for 37 the aging, the metropolitan transportation authority, the port authority 38 of New York and New Jersey, the chief professional officer of the state 39 coordinating chapter of the American Red Cross, the chief professional 40 officer of 2-1-1 New York state and three additional members, to be 41 appointed by the governor, two of whom shall be chief executives. Each 42 member agency may designate an executive level officer of that agency, 43 with responsibility for disaster preparedness matters, who may represent 44 that agency on the commission. The commissioner of the division of home- 45 land security and emergency services shall serve as chair of the commis- 46 sion, and the governor shall designate the vice chair of the commission. 47 The members of the commission, except those who serve ex officio, shall 48 be allowed their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the perform- 49 ance of their duties under this article but shall receive no additional 50 compensation for services rendered pursuant to this article. 51 § 15. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 11 of section 310 of the executive 52 law, as amended by chapter 463 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read 53 as follows: 54 (b) a "state authority," as defined in subdivision one of section two 55 of the public authorities law, and the following: 56 Albany County Airport Authority; S. 2344 9 1 Albany Port District Commission; 2 Alfred, Almond, Hornellsville Sewer Authority; 3 Battery Park City Authority; 4 Cayuga County Water and Sewer Authority; 5 (Nelson A. Rockefeller) Empire State Plaza Performing Arts 6 Center Corporation; 7 Industrial Exhibit Authority; 8 Livingston County Water and Sewer Authority; 9 Long Island Power Authority; 10 Long Island Rail Road; 11 Long Island Market Authority; 12 Manhattan and Bronx Surface Transit Operating Authority; 13 Metro-North Commuter Railroad; 14 Metropolitan Suburban Bus Authority; 15 Metropolitan Transportation Authority; 16 Natural Heritage Trust; 17 New York City Transit Authority; 18 New York Convention Center Operating Corporation; 19 New York State Bridge Authority; 20 New York State Olympic Regional Development Authority; 21 [New York State Thruway Authority;] 22 Niagara Falls Public Water Authority; 23 Niagara Falls Water Board; 24 Port of Oswego Authority; 25 Power Authority of the State of New York; 26 Roosevelt Island Operating Corporation; 27 Schenectady Metroplex Development Authority; 28 State Insurance Fund; 29 Staten Island Rapid Transit Operating Authority; 30 State University Construction Fund; 31 Syracuse Regional Airport Authority; 32 Triborough Bridge and Tunnel Authority. 33 Upper Mohawk valley regional water board. 34 Upper Mohawk valley regional water finance authority. 35 Upper Mohawk valley memorial auditorium authority. 36 Urban Development Corporation and its subsidiary corporations. 37 § 16. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 10-f of the highway 38 law, as amended by section 6 of part A of chapter 57 of the laws of 39 2014, is amended to read as follows: 40 (a) Funding of municipal projects will be made upon the application 41 for funding of prior expenditures in a format prescribed by the commis- 42 sioner. [Such funding of state projects may be pursuant to agreements 43 between the commissioner and the New York state thruway authority and 44 may be from the proceeds of bonds, notes or other obligations issued 45 pursuant to section three hundred eighty-five of the public authorities 46 law.] 47 § 17. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 10-g of the highway 48 law, as amended by section 7 of part A of chapter 57 of the laws of 49 2014, is amended to read as follows: 50 (a) Funding of municipal projects will be made upon the application 51 for funding of prior expenditures in a format prescribed by the commis- 52 sioner. [Such funding of state projects may be pursuant to agreements 53 between the commissioner and the New York state thruway authority and 54 may be from the proceeds of bonds, notes or other obligations issued 55 pursuant to section three hundred eighty-five of the public authorities 56 law.] S. 2344 10 1 § 18. Subdivision 4 of section 23 of the highway law, as added by 2 chapter 599 of the laws of 1987, is amended to read as follows: 3 4. In the preparation of this report the commissioner shall consult 4 with the county and other state governments, [the New York state thruway 5 authority,] the port authority of New York and New Jersey and such 6 public or private agencies as the commissioner deems appropriate. 7 § 19. Subdivision 4 of section 23 of the highway law, as added by 8 chapter 698 of the laws of 1987, is amended to read as follows: 9 4. In the preparation of this report, the commissioner and the commis- 10 sioner of environmental conservation shall consult with the county and 11 other state governments, [the New York state thruway authority,] the 12 port authority of New York and New Jersey and such public or private 13 agencies as the commissioner deems appropriate. 14 § 20. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 88-a of the highway 15 law, as amended by section 12 of part D of chapter 60 of the laws of 16 2012, is amended to read as follows: 17 (b) the chairperson, or [his or her] such chairperson's designated 18 representative, of the [New York state thruway authority, the] adiron- 19 dack park agency and the tourism advisory council; 20 § 21. The paragraph relating to interstate route 504, the paragraph 21 relating to interstate route 506, and the opening paragraph of the para- 22 graph relating to interstate route connection 520 of section 340-a of 23 the highway law, the paragraph relating to interstate route 504 as 24 amended by chapter 120 of the laws of 1987, the paragraph relating to 25 interstate route 506 and the opening paragraph of the paragraph relating 26 to interstate route connection 520, as amended by chapter 1110 of the 27 laws of 1971, are amended to read as follows: 28 Interstate Route 504. Beginning on the Pennsylvania-New York border in 29 the vicinity of Lake Erie, thence in a general northeasterly direction 30 passing in the vicinity of Dunkirk, to the vicinity of Big Tree and 31 generally northerly to the town of Cheektowaga, and continuing northerly 32 to the vicinity of Williamsville and generally easterly through or in 33 the vicinity of Batavia and Syracuse, intersecting interstate route 505 34 in the vicinity of Syracuse, continuing generally easterly passing 35 through or in the vicinity of Oneida, Utica, Little Falls, Amsterdam and 36 Schenectady to an intersection with interstate route 502 in the vicinity 37 of Albany the foregoing route being a portion of the New York state 38 thruway; thence in a general easterly direction through the city of 39 Albany to an intersection with interstate route connection 540 in the 40 vicinity of Lower Patroon Island, thence in a general southeasterly 41 direction to a point on the Berkshire section of the New York state 42 thruway in the vicinity of state highway five thousand eighty-four, as 43 determined by the commissioner of transportation [and the chairman of 44 the New York state thruway authority], thence continuing along the New 45 York state thruway to the New York-Massachusetts border, such interstate 46 route to be designated, in addition to any other name or designation, as 47 the "AMVETS Memorial Highway". 48 Interstate Route 506. Beginning at interstate route 504 in the town of 49 Cheektowaga, thence generally westerly and northwesterly through 50 Buffalo, across Grand Island, the foregoing route being a portion of the 51 New York state thruway, and thence generally westerly to the United 52 States-Canada border in the vicinity of Lewiston; also including a 53 connection beginning at the Peace bridge toll plaza, as determined by 54 the commissioner of transportation, thence generally southwesterly and 55 southerly to a point on the southbound lane of the Niagara section of 56 the New York state thruway in the vicinity of Porter avenue, as deter- S. 2344 11 1 mined by the commissioner of transportation [and the chairman of the New 2 York state thruway authority]. 3 From interstate route 502 in the vicinity of Elmsford, generally east- 4 erly passing through or northerly of White Plains to a connection with 5 interstate route 501 in the vicinity of Rye, including an interchange 6 with interstate route 501, which interchange is to be maintained and 7 constructed [jointly] by the department of transportation [and the New 8 York State thruway authority] in a manner determined by the commissioner 9 of transportation [and the New York State thruway authority]. The county 10 of Westchester is hereby authorized to convey to the state of New York 11 all the right, title, interest and option rights of the people of West- 12 chester county in and to such parts of the lands, buildings and other 13 real property and rights thereto acquired and held by it, as deemed 14 necessary by the commissioner of transportation of the state of New York 15 for purposes connected with an expressway known as interstate route 16 connection 520 (Central Westchester highway-Cross Westchester express- 17 way) from interstate route 502 in the vicinity of Elmsford in the town 18 of Greenburgh to a connection with interstate route 501 in the vicinity 19 of Rye, through and over the Tarrytown-White Plains parkway reservation, 20 Central Westchester parkway reservation, Bronx river parkway reserva- 21 tion, Silver Lake park reservation, Mamaroneck river parkway reservation 22 and Hutchinson river parkway reservation. 23 § 22. Subdivisions 4 and 5 of section 347 of the highway law, as 24 amended by chapter 394 of the laws of 1996, are amended to read as 25 follows: 26 4. If the commissioner shall determine, prior to the filing of such 27 copy of the acquisition map in the office of the county clerk as afore- 28 said, that changes, alterations or modifications of such description and 29 map as filed [in the main office of the New York state thruway authori- 30 ty] with the department of transportation should be made, [he or she] 31 the commissioner shall, subject to the provisions in article two of the 32 eminent domain procedure law if applicable, direct the preparation of an 33 amended acquisition map, either by preparing a new map or by making 34 changes on the original tracing of such map, with a notation indicating 35 such changes. On the approval of such amended map by the commissioner, 36 it shall be filed [in the main office of the New York state thruway 37 authority] with the department of transportation in the same manner as 38 the original map was filed and the amended map shall thereupon in all 39 respects and for all purposes supersede the map previously filed. 40 5. If the commissioner shall determine prior to filing a copy of the 41 map in the office of the county clerk or register as provided in section 42 four hundred two of the eminent domain procedure law, that such map 43 should be withdrawn, [he or she] the commissioner shall file a certif- 44 icate of withdrawal in the offices of the [New York state thruway 45 authority and] department of transportation and the department of law. 46 Upon the filing of such certificate of withdrawal, the map to which it 47 refers shall be cancelled and all rights thereunder shall cease and 48 determine. 49 § 23. Subdivision 22 of section 3.09 of the parks, recreation and 50 historic preservation law, as added by chapter 657 of the laws of 2006, 51 is amended to read as follows: 52 22. Be empowered to [enter into an agreement with the New York state 53 thruway authority, which shall allow the office to] utilize an electron- 54 ic toll collection system for the collection of any entrance fee or 55 parking fee at any historic site, park or recreational facility. S. 2344 12 1 § 24. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 2 of section 25.05 of the parks, 2 recreation and historic preservation law, is amended to read as follows: 3 (a) In an emergency, for the purpose of emergency travel only, during 4 the period of time when and at locations where snow upon the highways 5 renders travel by motor vehicles impractical, as so declared and permit- 6 ted [in the case of the state thruway by the thruway authority], in the 7 case of [other] state highways by the state agency or authority having 8 jurisdiction to regulate traffic thereon, and in the case of other high- 9 ways by the chief executive officer of the municipality having jurisdic- 10 tion over such highways. 11 § 25. Subdivisions 1 and 7 of section 1005-b of the public authorities 12 law, as added by section 22 of part TT of chapter 54 of the laws of 13 2016, are amended to read as follows: 14 1. The public benefit corporation known as the "New York state canal 15 corporation" (hereinafter referred to as the "canal corporation") 16 created as a subsidiary corporation of the former New York state thruway 17 authority pursuant to chapter seven hundred sixty-six of the laws of 18 nineteen hundred ninety-two is hereby continued and reconstituted as a 19 subsidiary corporation of the authority and shall have only the power to 20 operate, maintain, construct, reconstruct, improve, develop, finance, 21 and promote all of the canals, canal lands, feeder canals, reservoirs, 22 canal terminals, canal terminal lands and other property under the 23 jurisdiction of the canal corporation pursuant to article one-A of the 24 canal law (hereinafter referred to as the "canal system"). Reference in 25 any provision of law, general, special or local, or in any rule, regu- 26 lation or public document to the canal corporation or the canal corpo- 27 ration as a subsidiary of the former New York state thruway authority 28 shall be deemed to be and construed as a reference to the canal corpo- 29 ration continued by this section. 30 7. The employees of the canal corporation shall not be deemed to be 31 employees of the authority by reason of their employment by the canal 32 corporation. All officers and employees of the canal corporation shall 33 be subject to the provisions of the civil service law which shall apply 34 to the canal corporation and such corporation shall be subject to the 35 jurisdiction of the New York state department of civil service and the 36 New York state civil service commission. The canal corporation shall 37 participate in the New York state and local employees' retirement 38 system. Nothing contained in [a] part TT of chapter fifty-four of the 39 laws of two thousand sixteen [that added this section] shall be 40 construed to affect the rights and privileges of the canal corporation 41 or any of its employees under any provisions of the civil service law or 42 any existing or expired collective bargaining agreement in effect as of 43 the effective date of transfer of the canal corporation from the former 44 thruway authority to the authority. Any such employee who at the time of 45 such transfer shall have been in a negotiating unit represented by an 46 employee organization which was certified or recognized pursuant to 47 article fourteen of the civil service law shall continue to be repres- 48 ented by said employee organization. There shall be no reduction of 49 staff, loss of position, including partial displacement, such as 50 reduction in the hours of non-overtime, wages, or employment benefits as 51 a result of the transfer of the canal corporation from the former thru- 52 way authority to the authority for twenty-four months following such 53 transfer. 54 § 26. Subdivision 2 of section 2603-a of the public authorities law, 55 as amended by chapter 451 of the laws of 2017, is amended to read as 56 follows: S. 2344 13 1 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of this section, 2 all contracts over one million dollars in value made and awarded by the 3 dormitory authority, the metropolitan transportation authority, or the 4 bridge authority [or the thruway authority], on its account or for the 5 benefit of a state agency or authority, for the construction, recon- 6 struction, alteration, repair, maintenance or improvement of any road or 7 bridge, shall contain a provision that the structural iron and struc- 8 tural steel used or supplied in the performance of the contract or any 9 subcontract thereto and permanently incorporated into the surface road 10 or bridge shall be produced or made in whole or substantial part in the 11 United States, its territories or possessions. In the case of a struc- 12 tural iron or structural steel product all manufacturing must take place 13 in the United States, from the initial melting stage through the appli- 14 cation of coatings, except metallurgical processes involving the refine- 15 ment of steel additives. For purposes of this section, "permanently 16 incorporated" shall mean an iron or steel product that is required to 17 remain in place at the end of the project contract, in a fixed location, 18 affixed to the public work to which it was incorporated. Iron and steel 19 products that are capable of being moved from one location to another 20 are not permanently incorporated into a public building or public work. 21 § 27. Paragraph f of subdivision 6 of section 2897 of the public 22 authorities law, as added by section 1 of part F of chapter 58 of the 23 laws of 2020, is amended to read as follows: 24 f. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, disposals 25 for use of the [thruway authority's] department of transportation's 26 fiber optic system, or any part thereof, may be made through agreements 27 based on set fees that shall not require public auction, provided that: 28 i. the [thruway authority] department of transportation has determined 29 the disposal of such property complies with all applicable provisions of 30 this chapter; 31 ii. the [thruway authority] department of transportation has deter- 32 mined that disposal of such property is in the best interest of the 33 [thruway authority] department of transportation; 34 iii. the set fees established by the [thruway authority] department of 35 transportation for use of the fiber optic system, or part thereof, shall 36 be based on an independent appraisal of the fair market value of the 37 property; and 38 iv. any public authority, state agency, municipality, not-for-profit 39 hospital organized under section forty-three hundred one of the insur- 40 ance law, public library, or institution of higher education located in 41 New York state shall be required only to pay the actual cost of provid- 42 ing for use of the fiber optic system, but not exceeding the fair market 43 value determined pursuant to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph. For 44 purposes of this paragraph, "public authority" shall refer to entities 45 defined in section two of the public authorities law. For purposes of 46 this paragraph, "institution of higher education" shall refer to enti- 47 ties as defined in subdivisions two and three of section six hundred one 48 of the education law. 49 Disposals of the fiber optic system, or any part thereof, through 50 agreements based on set fees shall not require the explanatory state- 51 ments required by this section. Any disposal of property, contract for 52 disposal of property or agreement made pursuant to this paragraph shall 53 not be deemed valid and enforceable unless it shall first have been 54 approved by both the comptroller and the attorney general. S. 2344 14 1 § 28. Paragraph (j) of subdivision 1 of section 19 of the public offi- 2 cers law, as added by section 24 of part TT of chapter 54 of the laws of 3 2016, is amended to read as follows: 4 (j) For purposes of this section, the term "employee" shall include 5 directors, officers and employees of the [thruway authority, and the 6 directors, officers and employees of the] canal corporation. In those 7 cases where the definition of the term "employee" provided in this para- 8 graph is applicable, the term "state", as utilized in subdivisions two, 9 three, and four of this section, shall mean the [thruway authority when 10 the employee is a director, officer, or employee of the thruway authori- 11 ty, or the] canal corporation, when the employee is a director, officer, 12 or employee of the canal corporation. 13 § 29. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 582-a of the real 14 property tax law, as added by chapter 515 of the laws of 2001, is 15 amended to read as follows: 16 (b) On lands under lease from the state [or the thruway authority] for 17 non-residential purposes considered to support water dependent activ- 18 ities; 19 § 30. Subdivision h of section 13 of the retirement and social securi- 20 ty law, as amended by chapter 496 of the laws of 1967, is amended to 21 read as follows: 22 h. The retirement system may use a part of its funds, not exceeding 23 ten per centum of its assets, (1) for purchasing or leasing of land in 24 the city of Albany and the construction thereon of a suitable office 25 building or buildings for the transaction of the business of the retire- 26 ment system and (2) for purchasing or leasing of land in the cities of 27 Albany, Syracuse, Buffalo, Binghamton, New York, Rochester and Utica and 28 the construction thereon of a suitable office building or buildings for 29 purposes of lease or sale to the state and (3) for purchasing or leasing 30 of land in the city of Albany on the north and south sides of Washington 31 avenue commonly known as the "Campus Site" acquired by the state for a 32 state buildings site pursuant to the provisions of chapter five hundred 33 seventy-two of the laws of nineteen hundred forty-seven and the 34 construction thereon of power plants including service connections, 35 electric substations including service connections, garages, warehouses 36 and restaurant facilities deemed necessary for the efficient and econom- 37 ical operation of the office building or buildings constructed on such 38 land and (4) for purchasing or leasing of land in the city of Albany 39 acquired by the state for suitable parking facilities for the use prima- 40 rily of employees of the state and persons having business with state 41 departments and state agencies and the construction thereon of such 42 structures, appurtenances and facilities deemed necessary for the effi- 43 cient and economical operation of the parking facilities constructed on 44 such land and (5) for purchasing or leasing of land in locations 45 approved by the state university trustees and the construction, acquisi- 46 tion, reconstruction, rehabilitation or improvement of suitable build- 47 ings or facilities thereon for purposes of lease or sale to the state 48 university construction fund, such buildings or facilities to be used by 49 the state university or by state-operated institutions or statutory or 50 contract colleges under the jurisdiction of the state university or by 51 the students, faculty and staff of the state university or of any such 52 state-operated institution or statutory or contract college, and their 53 families [and (6) for purchasing of lands from the New York state thru- 54 way authority and the construction thereon of an office building or 55 other buildings for purposes of lease or sale to the thruway authority 56 for its own use under such terms and conditions, including consideration S. 2344 15 1 and length of term, as shall be agreed upon between the retirement 2 system and the thruway authority]. 3 The retirement system from time to time may lease to any public agency 4 any portion of a building constructed for the transaction of its busi- 5 ness which may not be required for such purpose, upon such terms and 6 conditions as shall be deemed to be for the best interest of the retire- 7 ment system. 8 Real property of the retirement system acquired or constructed pursu- 9 ant to this subdivision shall be exempt from taxation. 10 § 31. Paragraph 1 of subdivision j of section 41 of the retirement and 11 social security law, as amended by section 3 of part A of chapter 60 of 12 the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 13 1. In addition to any other service credit to which [he or she is] 14 they are entitled, a member who meets the requirements set forth in 15 paragraphs two and three of this subdivision shall be granted one day of 16 additional service credit for each day of accumulated unused sick leave 17 which [he or she] such member has at time of retirement for service, but 18 such credit shall not (a) exceed one hundred sixty-five days, (b) be 19 considered in meeting any service or age requirements prescribed in this 20 chapter, and (c) be considered in computing final average salary. Howev- 21 er, for an executive branch member designated managerial or confidential 22 pursuant to article fourteen of the civil service law or in the collec- 23 tive negotiating units established by article fourteen of the civil 24 service law designated the professional, scientific and technical 25 services unit, the rent regulation services negotiating unit, the secu- 26 rity services negotiating unit, the security supervisors negotiating 27 unit, the state university professional services negotiating unit, the 28 administrative services negotiating unit, the institutional services 29 negotiating unit, the operational services negotiating unit and the 30 division of military and naval affairs negotiating unit and, effective 31 on and after June twenty-seventh, two thousand seventeen for the agency 32 police services unit such service credit limitation provided in subpara- 33 graph (a) of this paragraph shall not exceed two hundred days. For a 34 nonjudicial officer or employee of the unified court system not in a 35 collective negotiating unit or in a collective negotiating unit speci- 36 fied in section one of chapter two hundred three of the laws of two 37 thousand four, for employees of the New York state dormitory authority, 38 [for employees of the New York state thruway authority,] the New York 39 state canal corporation and the state university construction fund and 40 for employees of the New York liquidation bureau such service credit 41 limitation provided in subparagraph (a) of this paragraph shall not 42 exceed two hundred days. For members who first become members of a 43 public retirement system of the state on or after April first, two thou- 44 sand twelve, such credit shall not exceed one hundred days. 45 § 32. Paragraphs (c), (d) and (e) of subdivision 1 of section 68-a of 46 the state finance law, as added by section 2 of part I of chapter 383 of 47 the laws of 2001, are amended to read as follows: 48 (c) [the New York state thruway authority; 49 (d)] the New York state environmental facilities corporation; 50 [(e)] (d) the New York state housing finance agency. 51 § 33. Subdivision 8 of section 68-b of the state finance law, as 52 amended by section 60 of part JJJ of chapter 59 of the laws of 2021, is 53 amended to read as follows: 54 8. Revenue bonds may only be issued for authorized purposes, as 55 defined in section sixty-eight-a of this article. Notwithstanding the 56 foregoing, the dormitory authority of the state of New York[,] and the S. 2344 16 1 urban development corporation [and the New York state thruway authority] 2 may issue revenue bonds for any authorized purpose of any other such 3 authorized issuer through March thirty-first, two thousand twenty-five. 4 [Any such revenue bonds issued by the New York state thruway authority 5 shall be subject to the approval of the New York state public authori- 6 ties control board, pursuant to section fifty-one of the public authori- 7 ties law.] The authorized issuers shall not issue any revenue bonds in 8 an amount in excess of statutory authorizations for such authorized 9 purposes. Authorizations for such authorized purposes shall be reduced 10 in an amount equal to the amount of revenue bonds issued for such 11 authorized purposes under this article. Such reduction shall not be made 12 in relation to revenue bonds issued to fund reserve funds, if any, and 13 costs of issuance, if these items are not counted under existing author- 14 izations, nor shall revenue bonds issued to refund bonds issued under 15 existing authorizations reduce the amount of such authorizations. 16 § 34. Subdivision 2 of section 69-j of the state finance law, as added 17 by section 1 of part HH of chapter 58 of the laws of 2012, is amended to 18 read as follows: 19 2. The New York works task force shall establish an implementation 20 council comprised of: the director of the division of the budget, the 21 commissioners of the department of economic development, the department 22 of transportation, the office of general services, the department of 23 labor, the department of environmental conservation and the office of 24 parks, recreation and historic preservation, the secretary of state, the 25 chancellors of the state university of New York and the city university 26 of New York, the president and chief executive officer of the environ- 27 mental facilities corporation, and the executive directors of the dormi- 28 tory authority of the state of New York, the New York power authority, 29 the Long Island power authority, the New York state energy research and 30 development authority, the New York state bridge authority, the metro- 31 politan transportation authority, [the New York state thruway authority] 32 and the port authority of New York and New Jersey, the director of state 33 operations and such other members as the New York works task force or 34 the governor may determine shall facilitate the purposes of the New York 35 works task force. Each member of the implementation council may desig- 36 nate an individual to attend and participate in New York works task 37 force meetings and deliberations on [his or her] such member's behalf. 38 § 35. Subdivision 1 of section 69-m of the state finance law, as added 39 by section 58 of part HH of chapter 57 of the laws of 2013, is amended 40 to read as follows: 41 1. "Authorized issuer" shall mean the dormitory authority of the state 42 of New York, the New York state urban development corporation, [the New 43 York state thruway authority,] and any successors thereto. 44 § 36. Subdivision 8 of section 69-n of the state finance law, as 45 amended by section 24-a of part I of chapter 60 of the laws of 2015, is 46 amended to read as follows: 47 8. Revenue bonds may only be issued for authorized purposes, as 48 defined in section sixty-nine-m of this article. Notwithstanding the 49 foregoing, any authorized issuer may issue revenue bonds for any author- 50 ized purpose. [Any such revenue bonds issued by the New York state thru- 51 way authority shall be subject to the approval of the New York state 52 public authorities control board, pursuant to section fifty-one of the 53 public authorities law.] The authorized issuers shall not issue any 54 revenue bonds in an amount in excess of statutory authorizations for 55 such authorized purposes. Authorizations for such authorized purposes 56 shall be reduced in an amount equal to the amount of revenue bonds S. 2344 17 1 issued for such authorized purposes under this article. Such reduction 2 shall not be made in relation to revenue bonds issued to fund reserve 3 funds, if any, and costs of issuance, if these items are not counted 4 under existing authorizations, nor shall revenue bonds issued to refund 5 bonds issued under existing authorizations reduce the amount of such 6 authorizations. 7 § 37. Subdivisions 6, 7 and 8 of section 88-b of the state finance 8 law, subdivision 6 as amended by chapter 65 of the laws of 1988, and 9 subdivisions 7 and 8 as added by chapter 13 of the laws of 1987, are 10 amended to read as follows: 11 6. Moneys in the suburban transportation fund transferred pursuant to 12 section twelve hundred seventy-a of the public authorities law shall be 13 made available to the state department of transportation for capital 14 projects in the counties of Nassau, Suffolk, Westchester, Putnam, Dutch- 15 ess, Orange and Rockland on the basis of each county's average pro rata 16 share of the mortgage recording tax receipts raised in such counties 17 pursuant to subdivision one of section two hundred sixty-one of the tax 18 law during the period January first, nineteen hundred eighty-four 19 through December thirty-first, nineteen hundred eighty-six as certified 20 by the metropolitan transportation authority. Moneys transferred to the 21 suburban transportation fund at the request of Dutchess, Orange or Rock- 22 land county pursuant to subdivision three of section twelve hundred 23 seventy-b of the public authorities law shall be used by the state 24 department of transportation to increase the proportionate share of such 25 capital projects in such county. Such projects shall be financed by 26 means of a state advance [to be reimbursed by the New York state thruway 27 authority, or its successor agency, through the issuance of its bonds or 28 notes in the manner set forth in subdivision seven of this section, or 29 by means of a state advance] to be reimbursed directly from the suburban 30 transportation fund. 31 7. (a) For projects funded by the suburban transportation fund, 32 payments to the state department of transportation [may enter into an 33 agreement with the New York state thruway authority, or its successor 34 agency, for the purpose of having the thruway authority, or its succes- 35 sor agency, issue bonds or notes to pay the capital costs of such 36 project. Such agreement shall be subject to approval by the director of 37 the division of the budget. 38 (b) For projects funded pursuant to this subdivision, the affected 39 municipality shall enter into an agreement with the department of trans- 40 portation for the conveyance of all affected real property including 41 highways, roads and bridges to the thruway authority, or its successor 42 agency, for the term of the bonds or notes issued by the thruway author- 43 ity, or its successor agency, for such project or for such lesser period 44 that such bonds or notes are outstanding. During the period of such 45 conveyance to the thruway authority, or its successor agency, the 46 department of transportation or the municipality shall agree to maintain 47 the facility in a state of good repair, the responsibility for which 48 shall be with the state, or municipality, which had jurisdiction over 49 said facility prior to such agreement. 50 (c) Upon the final retirement of all bonds and notes issued by the 51 thruway authority, or its successor agency, for such purpose, such prop- 52 erty shall automatically revert to the conveying entity. 53 8. Payments to the thruway authority, or its successor agency,] pursu- 54 ant to this section shall be subject to appropriation from the suburban 55 transportation fund. [The thruway authority, or its successor agency, S. 2344 18 1 shall utilize such moneys to pay the debt service on such bonds or notes 2 and to meet administrative costs in connection therewith.] 3 § 38. Paragraphs (b), (c) and (d) of subdivision 3 and subdivisions 8 4 and 11 of section 89-b of the state finance law, paragraphs (b), (c) and 5 (d) of subdivision 3 as amended by chapter 56 of the laws of 1993, and 6 subdivisions 8 and 11 as added by section 4 of part O of chapter 59 of 7 the laws of 2009, are amended to read as follows: 8 (b) Moneys in the special obligation reserve and payment account 9 shall, following appropriation by the legislature, be used [to pay 10 amounts due to the New York state thruway authority as dedicated highway 11 and bridge trust fund cooperative agreement payments pursuant to the 12 provisions of dedicated highway and bridge trust fund cooperative agree- 13 ments entered into between the authority and] by the department of 14 transportation [pursuant to sections ten-e, ten-f, and ten-g of the 15 highway law, the provisions of section three hundred eighty-five of the 16 public authorities law] for use towards maintaining the New York state 17 thruway, and pursuant to the provisions of this section. 18 (c) The comptroller is hereby authorized and directed to transfer 19 monthly no later than the last day of each month, any moneys, if any, in 20 excess of the aggregate amounts required to be set aside in order to 21 meet the requirements established in paragraph (d) of this subdivision, 22 to the highway and bridge capital account, provided however that in no 23 event shall such transfers occur unless and until the aggregate of all 24 dedicated highway and bridge trust fund cooperative agreement payments 25 certified to the comptroller for such fiscal year shall have been appro- 26 priated in accordance with the provisions of this section. [Addi- 27 tionally, in no event shall the comptroller pay over and distribute any 28 revenues of the fund to any person other than the New York state thruway 29 authority if any payment required to be set aside pursuant to paragraph 30 (b) of this subdivision has not been made to the authority on the date 31 by which it was required to have been made pursuant to such schedule; 32 provided, however, that no person, including such authority or the hold- 33 ers of its bonds or notes shall have any lien on such revenues and such 34 agreement shall be executory only to the extent of such revenues avail- 35 able to the state in such fund. 36 (d) Upon receipt by the comptroller of a certificate or certificates 37 from the chairperson of the New York state thruway authority submitted 38 pursuant to section three hundred eighty-five of the public authorities 39 law, that such authority requires a payment or payments, from the dedi- 40 cated highway and bridge trust fund, the comptroller shall pay from such 41 fund pursuant to an appropriation on or before the fifteenth day of any 42 month preceding the payment as the chairperson thereof may direct in any 43 such certificate, the amount or amounts so certified. The chairperson of 44 such authority shall furnish the commissioner of taxation and finance 45 with copies of such certificates. In order to set aside the moneys 46 necessary to meet the amounts required on the payment date or dates 47 herein, the comptroller shall comply with the provisions of this subdi- 48 vision.] 49 8. The state comptroller shall at the commencement of each month 50 certify to the director of the budget, the chairpersons of the senate 51 finance and assembly ways and means committees, and the commissioner of 52 transportation[, and the chairman of the thruway authority] the amount 53 disbursed from the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund in the 54 preceding month, the amounts reimbursed [by the thruway authority] 55 pursuant to appropriation by the legislature, the revenues received in S. 2344 19 1 the fund, and the unreimbursed disbursements[, in accordance with 2 section ten-e of the highway law]. 3 11. The department of transportation shall provide to the state comp- 4 troller and the chairpersons of the senate finance and assembly ways and 5 means committees, [not later than fourteen days subsequent to reimburse- 6 ment from bond proceeds to the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund, 7 a cooperative agreement schedule of all projects so reimbursed. Such] 8 after an appropriation from the dedicated highway and bridge trust fund, 9 a schedule of uses of such appropriation funds, that shall include, but 10 not be limited to, an identifying project number, the work type, project 11 description, county, total cost, percentage of federal funding, letting 12 date, scheduled completion date, [life to date dedicated highway and 13 bridge trust fund disbursements, prior amount of thruway authority bond 14 proceeds reimbursement, the amount of the current reimbursement,] and 15 the probable life of each such project. 16 § 39. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 92-r of the state 17 finance law, as amended by chapter 56 of the laws of 1993, is amended to 18 read as follows: 19 (a) Upon receipt by the comptroller of a certificate or certificates 20 from the chairperson of the local government assistance corporation 21 submitted pursuant to section thirty-two hundred forty of the public 22 authorities law, that such corporation requires a payment or payments, 23 from the local government assistance tax fund, the comptroller shall pay 24 from such fund pursuant to an appropriation on or before the date speci- 25 fied in such certificate or within thirty days after such receipt, 26 whichever is later, to such corporation, as the chairperson thereof may 27 direct in any such certificate, the amount or amounts so certified. The 28 chairperson of such corporation shall furnish the commissioner of taxa- 29 tion and finance with copies of such certificates. In order to set aside 30 the moneys necessary to meet the amounts required on the payment date or 31 dates specified in such certificate or certificates, the comptroller 32 shall comply with the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subdivision. 33 The comptroller shall from time to time, but in no event later than the 34 fifteenth day of each month (other than the last month of the fiscal 35 year) and the last day of the last month of the fiscal year of each 36 fiscal year, pay over and distribute to the credit of the general fund 37 of the state treasury all revenues in the local government assistance 38 tax fund, if any, in excess of the aggregate amount required to be set 39 aside pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subdivision provided that an 40 appropriation has been made to pay all amounts specified in such certif- 41 icate or certificates as being required by the corporation for such 42 fiscal year[, and provided further that an appropriation has been made 43 to make all dedicated highway and bridge trust fund cooperative agree- 44 ment payments specified in the certificate submitted by the chairperson 45 of the New York state thruway authority pursuant to subdivision two of 46 section three hundred eighty-five of the public authorities law]. In no 47 event shall the comptroller pay over and distribute any revenues (other 48 than the amount to be deducted for administering, collecting and 49 distributing such sales and compensating use taxes) to any person other 50 than the local government assistance corporation (i) unless and until 51 the aggregate of all payments certified to the comptroller as required 52 by such corporation and required to be set aside pursuant to paragraph 53 (b) of this subdivision for such fiscal year shall have been appropri- 54 ated to such corporation in accordance with the schedule specified in 55 the certificate or certificates filed by the chairperson of the corpo- 56 ration or (ii) if, after having been so certified and appropriated, any S. 2344 20 1 payment required to be set aside pursuant to paragraph (b) of this 2 subdivision has not been made to the corporation on the date by which it 3 was required to have been made pursuant to such schedule[, or (iii) 4 unless and until the aggregate of all dedicated highway and bridge trust 5 fund cooperative agreement payments certified by the chairperson of the 6 New York state thruway authority pursuant to subdivision two of section 7 three hundred eighty-five of the public authorities law shall have been 8 appropriated to such authority]; provided, however, that no person 9 including such corporation or the holders of its bonds or notes shall 10 have any lien on such revenues and such agreement shall be executory 11 only to the extent of such revenues available to the state in such fund 12 and provided further that, if the state has appropriated and paid to the 13 corporation the amounts necessary for the corporation to meet its 14 requirements, for the current fiscal year, pursuant to the certificate 15 or certificates submitted by the chairperson pursuant to section thir- 16 ty-two hundred forty of the public authorities law and notwithstanding 17 any other provision of law, the comptroller shall, on the last day of 18 each fiscal year, pay to the general fund of the state all sums remain- 19 ing in the local government assistance tax fund on such date. 20 § 40. Subdivision 6 of section 501 of the tax law, as amended by chap- 21 ter 170 of the laws of 1994, is amended to read as follows: 22 6. "Public highway" shall include any public highway, street, avenue, 23 road, public place, public driveway or any other public way[; provided, 24 however, that the term "public highway" as used in sections five hundred 25 three and five hundred three-b of this article shall not include any 26 portion of the thruway for which a fee, rental or charge for the use 27 thereof, has been made by the thruway authority pursuant to the 28 provisions of title nine of article two of the public authorities law]. 29 § 41. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 514 of the tax law, as 30 amended by section 9 of part E of chapter 60 of the laws of 2007, is 31 amended to read as follows: 32 (a) Upon agreement with the heads of the department of motor vehicles, 33 the department of transportation, the department of environmental 34 conservation, the division of state police, [the thruway authority,] the 35 United States department of transportation, and the United States 36 department of homeland security (or any other federal agency which may 37 assume the duties of either or both of such federal agencies), the 38 commissioner may disclose to such agencies the name, address, employer 39 identification number, vehicle identification number, application status 40 information, and other appropriate identifying and application informa- 41 tion, of persons holding a certification of registration or license 42 under this article, persons whose certificate of registration or license 43 under this article has been revoked, suspended or surrendered, and 44 persons whose application for a certificate of registration or license 45 under this article has been denied, for the purposes of improving the 46 safety and security oversight of the motor carrier industry and coordi- 47 nating and streamlining the credentialing process for such industry 48 administered by such agencies. 49 § 42. Subdivision 1 of section 14-j of the transportation law, as 50 added by chapter 56 of the laws of 1993, is amended to read as follows: 51 1. The commissioner is hereby authorized to [enter into a contract, 52 lease or agreement with the New York state thruway authority for the] 53 seek appropriation from the legislature for financing [by such authori- 54 ty] of the special rail and aviation transportation program as author- 55 ized by law. S. 2344 21 1 § 43. Subdivision 1 and paragraphs (a), (b), (c) and (e) of subdivi- 2 sion 4 of section 14-k of the transportation law, subdivision 1 as added 3 by chapter 637 of the laws of 1996, paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of 4 subdivision 4 as amended and paragraph (e) of subdivision 4 as added by 5 section 1 of part P of chapter 61 of the laws of 2000, are amended to 6 read as follows: 7 1. There is hereby established the "multi-modal program". [The commis- 8 sioner is hereby authorized to enter into a contract, lease or agreement 9 with the New York state thruway authority for the financing by such 10 authority of the multi-modal program as authorized by law.] 11 (a) project costs for construction, reconstruction, improvement, 12 reconditioning and preservation of rail freight facilities and for the 13 project costs of intercity rail passenger facilities and equipment where 14 the service life of the project is at least ten years. Funding of 15 project expenditures for an approved project shall require certification 16 by the project sponsor to the department that the project has a service 17 life of ten or more years. [Such certification shall include any such 18 information as may be necessary to maintain, if applicable, the federal 19 tax exempt status of bonds, notes or other obligations issued by the New 20 York state thruway authority for such purposes.] The commissioner shall 21 request the project sponsors to furnish such information in writing as 22 may be necessary; 23 (b) project costs for construction, reconstruction, improvement, 24 reconditioning and preservation of state, municipal, or privately owned 25 ports where the service life of the project is at least ten years. 26 Funding of project expenditures for an approved project shall require 27 certification by the project sponsor to the department that the project 28 has a service life of ten or more years. [Such certification shall 29 include any such information as may be necessary to maintain, if appli- 30 cable, the federal tax exempt status of bonds, notes or other obli- 31 gations issued by the New York state thruway authority for such 32 purposes.] The commissioner shall request the project sponsors to 33 furnish such information in writing as may be necessary; 34 (c) project costs of construction, reconstruction, improvement, recon- 35 ditioning and preservation of municipal airports, privately owned 36 airports and aviation capital facilities, excluding airports operated by 37 the state or operated by a bi-state municipal corporate instrumentality, 38 for which federal funding is not available provided the project is 39 consistent with an approved airport layout plan, where the service life 40 of the project is at least ten years. Funding of project expenditures 41 for an approved project shall require certification that the project has 42 a service life of ten or more years. [Such certification shall include 43 any such information as may be necessary to maintain, if applicable, the 44 federal tax exempt status of bonds, notes or other obligations issued by 45 the New York state thruway authority for such purposes.] The commission- 46 er shall request the project sponsors to furnish such information in 47 writing as may be necessary; 48 (e) project costs for construction, reconstruction, improvement, 49 reconditioning and preservation of fixed ferry facilities of municipal 50 and privately owned ferry lines for transportation purposes, where the 51 service life of the project is at least ten years. Funding of the 52 project expenditures for an approved project shall require certification 53 by the project sponsor to the department that the project has a service 54 life of ten or more years. [Such certification shall include any such 55 information as may be necessary to maintain, if applicable, the federal 56 tax exempt status of bonds, notes or other obligations issued by the New S. 2344 22 1 York state thruway authority for such purposes.] The commissioner shall 2 request the project sponsors to furnish such information in writing as 3 may be necessary. 4 § 44. Section 22 of the transportation law, as added by chapter 223 of 5 the laws of 2005, is amended to read as follows: 6 § 22. Work zone safety and enforcement. The department shall, in coop- 7 eration with the superintendent of state police, the commissioner of 8 motor vehicles, [the chairman of the New York state thruway authority,] 9 local law enforcement agencies and representatives for contractors and 10 laborers, develop and implement rules and regulations for the increased 11 safety of work zones. Such rules and regulations shall include, but 12 shall not be limited to, a police presence at all major active work 13 zones as defined by rules and regulations set forth by the commissioner, 14 the use of radar speed display signs at all major active work zones as 15 defined by rules and regulations set forth by the commissioner, and a 16 system for reviewing work zone safety and design for all work zones 17 under the jurisdiction of the department. 18 § 45. Section 33 of the transportation law, as added by chapter 420 of 19 the laws of 1968, is amended to read as follows: 20 § 33. Purposes of fund. The purposes of this fund shall be to provide 21 a means for elimination of existing tolls, except bridge tolls, on the 22 Niagara section of the Governor Thomas E. Dewey Thruway [within the 23 context of protection of the rights of the bond holders of the New York 24 State Thruway Authority]. 25 § 46. Subdivision 9 of section 481 of the transportation law, as 26 amended by section 25 of part TT of chapter 54 of the laws of 2016, is 27 amended to read as follows: 28 9. "Canal corporation" shall mean the New York state canal corporation 29 created as a subsidiary corporation of the former New York state thruway 30 authority pursuant to chapter seven hundred sixty-six of the laws of 31 nineteen hundred ninety-two and continued and reconstituted as a subsid- 32 iary corporation of the power authority of the state of New York pursu- 33 ant to subdivision one of section one thousand five-b of the public 34 authorities law. 35 § 47. Section 122 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chap- 36 ter 193 of the laws of 1974, is amended to read as follows: 37 § 122. Local authorities. Every county, municipal or other local 38 board, body or officer, county park commission, parkway authority, 39 bridge authority, bridge and tunnel authority, the office of parks and 40 recreation, [the New York state thruway authority] or similar body or 41 person having authority to enact laws or regulations relating to traffic 42 under the constitution and laws of this state. 43 § 48. Subdivision 15-a of section 385 of the vehicle and traffic law, 44 as added by chapter 27 of the laws of 1981, is amended to read as 45 follows: 46 15-a. In furtherance of the authority to issue permits pursuant to 47 subdivision fifteen of this section, the department of transportation 48 [and the New York state thruway authority are authorized to enter into a 49 cooperative agreement relative] is authorized to issue permits to oper- 50 ate or move vehicles or combinations of vehicles the weights or the 51 dimensions of which exceed the limitations otherwise provided for in 52 this section along the thruway system and state highway system, routes 5 53 and 49 between the relocated thruway interchanges, including the Edic 54 road interchange, and River road in the vicinity of Edic road in the 55 vicinity of the city of Utica. Permits issued hereunder may be of a 56 joint or reciprocal type for operations or movements on such highway S. 2344 23 1 systems and shall not be limited to loads proposed as one piece or item 2 or otherwise cannot be separated into units of less weight. 3 § 49. Subdivision 6 of section 511-b of the vehicle and traffic law, 4 as amended by chapter 425 of the laws of 1989, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 6. For the purposes of this section, the term "local authority" means 7 the municipality in which the motor vehicle was seized; except that if 8 the motor vehicle was seized on [property of the New York state thruway 9 authority or] property under the jurisdiction of the office of parks, 10 recreation and historic preservation, the department of transportation, 11 or a public authority or commission, the term "local authority" means 12 such authority, office, department, or commission. A county may provide 13 by local law that the county may act as the agent for a local authority 14 under this section. 15 § 50. Section 549 of the vehicle and traffic law, as added by chapter 16 659 of the laws of 1995, is amended to read as follows: 17 § 549. Cancellation of an escort certificate. An escort certificate 18 shall be cancelled by the commissioner if such person's underlying driv- 19 er's license has expired, is revoked or suspended or upon notification 20 by the commissioner of transportation [or the New York state thruway 21 authority] that the person has violated any rule or regulation of the 22 commissioner of transportation [or the New York state thruway authority] 23 governing the operation, use and equipment of escort vehicles and the 24 duties and responsibilities of the operator of an escort vehicle. 25 § 51. Subdivision 2 of section 1180-a of the vehicle and traffic law, 26 as amended by chapter 464 of the laws of 2003, is amended to read as 27 follows: 28 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdi- 29 vision one of this section, upon The Governor Thomas E. Dewey Thruway as 30 such term is defined in section three hundred fifty-six of the public 31 authorities law, the [New York state thruway authority] department of 32 transportation may establish a maximum speed limit of not more than 33 sixty-five miles per hour provided that such maximum allowable speed 34 limit is established in accordance with all applicable rules and regu- 35 lations. 36 § 52. Paragraph 2 of subdivision (a), paragraphs 1, 7 and 8 of subdi- 37 vision (c), and paragraphs 11, 12 and 13 of subdivision (m) of section 38 1180-e of the vehicle and traffic law, as added by chapter 421 of the 39 laws of 2021, are amended to read as follows: 40 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, after holding a public 41 hearing in accordance with the public officers law and subsequent 42 approval of the establishment of a demonstration program in accordance 43 with this section by [a majority of the members of the entire board of 44 the thruway authority, the chair of the thruway authority] the depart- 45 ment of transportation, the commissioner is hereby authorized to estab- 46 lish a demonstration program imposing monetary liability on the owner of 47 a vehicle for failure of an operator thereof to comply with posted maxi- 48 mum speed limits in a highway construction or maintenance work area 49 located on the thruway (i) when highway construction or maintenance work 50 is occurring and a work area speed limit is in effect as provided in 51 paragraph two of subdivision (d) or subdivision (f) of section eleven 52 hundred eighty of this article or (ii) when highway construction or 53 maintenance work is occurring and other speed limits are in effect as 54 provided in subdivision (b) or (g) or paragraph one of subdivision (d) 55 of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. Such demonstration 56 program shall empower the chair to install photo speed violation moni- S. 2344 24 1 toring systems within no more than ten highway construction or mainte- 2 nance work areas located on the thruway and to operate such systems 3 within such work areas (iii) when highway construction or maintenance 4 work is occurring and a work area speed limit is in effect as provided 5 in paragraph two of subdivision (d) or subdivision (f) of section eleven 6 hundred eighty of this article or (iv) when highway construction or 7 maintenance work is occurring and other speed limits are in effect as 8 provided in subdivision (b) or (g) or paragraph one of subdivision (d) 9 of section eleven hundred eighty of this article. The chair, in consul- 10 tation with the superintendent of the division of state police, shall 11 determine the location of the highway construction or maintenance work 12 areas located on the thruway in which to install and operate photo speed 13 violation monitoring systems. In selecting a highway construction or 14 maintenance work area in which to install and operate a photo speed 15 violation monitoring system, the chair shall consider criteria includ- 16 ing, but not limited to, the speed data, crash history, and roadway 17 geometry applicable to such highway construction or maintenance work 18 area. A photo speed violation monitoring system shall not be installed 19 or operated on a thruway exit ramp. 20 1. "chair" shall mean the chair of the [New York state thruway author- 21 ity] demonstration program created pursuant to this section, who shall 22 be appointed by the commissioner; 23 7. ["thruway authority" shall mean the New York state thruway authori- 24 ty, a body corporate and politic constituting a public corporation 25 created and constituted pursuant to title nine of article two of the 26 public authorities law; and 27 8.] "thruway" shall mean generally a divided highway under the juris- 28 diction of the [thruway authority] department of transportation for 29 mixed traffic with access limited as the [authority] department of 30 transportation may determine and generally with grade separations at 31 intersections, commonly referred to as the New York state thruway. 32 11. the total amount of revenue realized by the state [or thruway 33 authority] in connection with the program; 34 12. the expenses incurred by the state [or the thruway authority] in 35 connection with the program; 36 13. an itemized list of expenditures made by the state [and the thru- 37 way authority] on work zone safety projects undertaken in accordance 38 with subdivisions eleven and twelve of section eighteen hundred three of 39 this chapter; and 40 § 53. Subdivision (a) and paragraph 1 of subdivision (b) of section 41 1204 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 193 of the 42 laws of 1974, are amended to read as follows: 43 (a) Whenever any police officer, or in a city having a population in 44 excess of one million any person designated by the commissioner of traf- 45 fic of such city or on highways under the jurisdiction of the [New York 46 state thruway authority] department of transportation, the office of 47 parks and recreation, a county park commission, a parkway authority, a 48 bridge authority or a bridge and tunnel authority any person designated 49 by such office, commission or authority, finds a vehicle standing upon a 50 highway in violation of any of the foregoing provisions of this article 51 such officer is hereby authorized to move such vehicle, or require the 52 driver or other person in charge of the vehicle to move the same to a 53 position off the paved or main-traveled part of such highway. 54 1. Whenever any police officer, or in a city having a population in 55 excess of one million any person designated by the commissioner of traf- 56 fic of such city or on highways under the jurisdiction of the [New York S. 2344 25 1 state thruway authority] department of transportation, the office of 2 parks and recreation, a county park commission, a parkway authority, a 3 bridge authority or a bridge and tunnel authority any person designated 4 by such office, commission or authority finds a vehicle unattended where 5 it constitutes an obstruction to traffic, or any place where stopping, 6 standing or parking is prohibited, such officer is hereby authorized to 7 provide for the removal of such vehicle, semitrailer or trailer to a 8 garage, automobile pound or other place of safety. 9 § 54. Subdivision 4 of section 1224 of the vehicle and traffic law, as 10 amended by chapter 298 of the laws of 1987, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 4. For the purposes of this section, a local authority entitled to 13 custody of an abandoned vehicle shall be the town in which the vehicle 14 was abandoned, or if abandoned in a city or village, the city or village 15 in which the vehicle was abandoned, except that if a vehicle is aban- 16 doned on property [of the New York state thruway authority or property] 17 under the jurisdiction of the office of parks, recreation and historic 18 preservation, the department of transportation, or a public authority or 19 commission, such authority, office, department or commission shall be 20 entitled to the custody of such vehicle. Notwithstanding any provision 21 of this section to the contrary, the office of general services shall be 22 entitled to the custody of any vehicle abandoned on state property 23 subsequent to its sale by such office. The commissioner may, by regu- 24 lation, provide that a county may act as the agent for a local authority 25 for the purpose of removing and disposing of abandoned vehicles. 26 § 55. Subdivision (a) of section 1603 of the vehicle and traffic law, 27 as amended by chapter 142 of the laws of 2000, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 (a) Any or all of the powers granted by this chapter to the legisla- 30 tive body of a city or village or to [the New York state thruway author- 31 ity,] the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation, the 32 department of environmental conservation, the department of agriculture 33 and markets, the industrial exhibit authority, a county park commission, 34 a parkway authority, a bridge authority or a bridge and tunnel authority 35 may be delegated to any official, board or agency thereof designated by 36 it or designated by law. If any authority or commission herein mentioned 37 shall cease to exist, its powers as granted by this chapter shall 38 devolve upon the state or municipal corporation succeeding to the prop- 39 erty, functions, powers and duties of such authority or commission, as 40 the case may be, and may be delegated by its legislative body to any 41 official, board or agency thereof as designated by it or by law. 42 § 56. The opening paragraph of section 1630 of the vehicle and traffic 43 law, as amended by chapter 142 of the laws of 2000, is amended to read 44 as follows: 45 [The New York state thruway authority, a] A county park commission, 46 the Niagara Falls bridge commission, a parkway authority, a bridge 47 authority, including the Buffalo and Fort Erie public bridge authority, 48 the metropolitan transportation authority, the Long Island Rail Road, 49 the Metro-North Commuter Railroad, the office of parks, recreation and 50 historic preservation, the department of environmental conservation, the 51 department of transportation, the department of agriculture and markets, 52 the industrial exhibit authority or a bridge and tunnel authority may by 53 ordinance, order, rule or regulation prohibit, restrict or regulate 54 traffic on or pedestrian use of any highway, property or facility under 55 its jurisdiction. The provisions of section sixteen hundred of this 56 title shall be applicable to such ordinances, orders, rules and regu- S. 2344 26 1 lations, provided, however, that such ordinances, orders, rules and 2 regulations shall supersede the provisions of this chapter where incon- 3 sistent or in conflict with respect to the following enumerated 4 subjects: 5 § 57. Section 1631 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended to read 6 as follows: 7 § 1631. Additional traffic regulation on the New York state thruway. 8 In addition to the other powers granted by this article, the [New York 9 state thruway authority] department of transportation may by order, rule 10 or regulation prohibit or regulate overtaking and passing on the New 11 York state thruway. Any such order, rule or regulation shall supersede 12 the provisions of section eleven hundred twenty-three of this chapter. 13 § 58. Section 1646 of the vehicle and traffic law, as separately 14 amended by chapters 78 and 934 of th laws of 1960 and as renumbered by 15 chapter 431 of the laws of 1992, is amended to read as follows: 16 § 1646. Application of article. This article shall not apply with 17 respect to state highways maintained by the state which are controlled- 18 access highways outside of cities having a population in excess of one 19 million, nor to highways under the jurisdiction of the [New York state 20 thruway authority] department of transportation, a regional state park 21 commission, a county park commission, a parkway authority, a bridge 22 authority, or a bridge and tunnel authority, except that this article 23 shall apply to any portion of the New York state thruway that is located 24 within a city having a population in excess of one million. 25 § 59. Section 1664 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chap- 26 ter 193 of the laws of 1974, is amended to read as follows: 27 § 1664. Application of article. This article shall not apply with 28 respect to state highways maintained by the state which are controlled 29 access highways, nor to highways under the jurisdiction of the [New York 30 state thruway authority] department of transportation, the office of 31 parks and recreation, a county park commission, a parkway authority, a 32 bridge authority, or a bridge and tunnel authority. 33 § 60. Subdivision (b) of section 1683 of the vehicle and traffic law, 34 as amended by chapter 193 of the laws of 1974, is amended to read as 35 follows: 36 (b) Such signs shall be required for orders, ordinances, rules, or 37 regulations made by the [New York state thruway authority] department of 38 transportation, the office of parks and recreation, a county park 39 commission, a parkway authority, a bridge authority, a bridge and tunnel 40 authority or the legislative body of a city having a population in 41 excess of one million or any board, body or official to whom the power 42 of such local authority has been designated only in so far as such local 43 authorities in their discretion may deem practicable. 44 § 61. Subdivision 12 of section 1803 of the vehicle and traffic law, 45 as amended by chapter 557 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 46 follows: 47 12. Where the [chair of the New York state thruway authority] commis- 48 sioner of transportation has established a demonstration program impos- 49 ing monetary liability on the owner of a vehicle for failure of an oper- 50 ator thereof to comply with subdivision (b), (d), (f) or (g) of section 51 eleven hundred eighty of this chapter in accordance with section eleven 52 hundred eighty-e of this chapter, any fine or penalty collected by a 53 court, judge, magistrate or other officer for an imposition of liability 54 which occurs pursuant to such program shall be paid to the state comp- 55 troller within the first ten days of the month following collection, 56 except as otherwise provided in subdivision three of section ninety- S. 2344 27 1 nine-a of the state finance law. Every such payment shall be accompa- 2 nied by a statement in such form and detail as the comptroller shall 3 provide. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision five of this 4 section, eighty percent of any such fine or penalty imposed for such 5 liability shall be paid to the [thruway authority] department of trans- 6 portation, and twenty percent of any such fine or penalty shall be paid 7 to the city, town or village in which the violation giving rise to the 8 liability occurred, provided, however, that within a county that has 9 established a traffic and parking violations agency pursuant to section 10 three hundred seventy of the general municipal law and such liability is 11 disposed of by such agency, eighty percent of any such fine or penalty 12 imposed for such liability shall be paid to the [thruway authority] 13 department of transportation, and twenty percent of any such fine or 14 penalty shall be paid to the county in which the violation giving rise 15 to the liability occurred. With respect to the percentage of fines or 16 penalties paid to the [thruway authority] department of transportation, 17 no less than sixty percent shall be dedicated to [thruway authority] 18 department of transportation work zone safety projects after deducting 19 the expenses necessary to administer such demonstration program, 20 provided, however, that such funds provided pursuant to this subdivision 21 shall be payable on the audit and warrant of the comptroller and shall 22 only be used to supplement and not supplant current expenditures of 23 state funds on work zone safety projects. For the purposes of this 24 subdivision, "work zone safety projects" shall apply to work zones under 25 the jurisdiction of the [thruway authority] department of transportation 26 and shall include, but not be limited to, inspection and implementation 27 of work zone design, maintenance, traffic plans and markings, worker 28 safety training, contractor outreach, enforcement efforts, radar speed 29 display signs at major active work zones and police presence at major 30 active work zones, as provided in section twenty-two of the transporta- 31 tion law. [For the purposes of this subdivision, the term "thruway 32 authority" shall mean the New York state thruway authority, a body 33 corporate and politic constituting a public corporation created and 34 constituted pursuant to title nine of article two of the public authori- 35 ties law.] All fines, penalties and forfeitures paid to a county, city, 36 town or village pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision shall be 37 credited to the general fund of such county, city, town or village, 38 unless a different disposition is prescribed by charter, special law, 39 local law or ordinance. 40 § 62. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 6 of section 40 of the veterans' 41 services law is amended to read as follows: 42 (b) a "state authority" as defined in subdivision one of section two 43 of the public authorities law, and the following: 44 Albany County Airport Authority; 45 Albany Port District Commission; 46 Alfred, Almond, Hornellsville Sewer Authority; 47 Battery Park City Authority; 48 Cayuga County Water and Sewer Authority; 49 (Nelson A. Rockefeller) Empire State Plaza Performing Arts Center 50 Corporation; 51 Industrial Exhibit Authority; 52 Livingston County Water and Sewer Authority; 53 Long Island Power Authority; 54 Long Island Rail Road; 55 Long Island Market Authority; 56 Manhattan and Bronx Surface Transit Operating Authority; S. 2344 28 1 Metro-North Commuter Railroad; 2 Metropolitan Suburban Bus Authority; 3 Metropolitan Transportation Authority; 4 Natural Heritage Trust; 5 New York City Transit Authority; 6 New York Convention Center Operating Corporation; 7 New York State Bridge Authority; 8 New York State Olympic Regional Development Authority; 9 [New York State Thruway Authority;] 10 Niagara Falls Public Water Authority; 11 Niagara Falls Water Board; 12 Port of Oswego Authority; 13 Power Authority of the State of New York; 14 Roosevelt Island Operating Corporation; 15 Schenectady Metroplex Development Authority; 16 State Insurance Fund; 17 Staten Island Rapid Transit Operating Authority; 18 State University Construction Fund; 19 Syracuse Regional Airport Authority; 20 Triborough Bridge and Tunnel Authority; 21 Upper Mohawk valley regional water board; 22 Upper Mohawk valley regional water finance authority; 23 Upper Mohawk valley memorial auditorium authority; 24 Urban Development Corporation and its subsidiary corporations. 25 § 63. Title 9 of article 2 of the public authorities law is REPEALED. 26 § 64. Subdivision 15 of section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is 27 REPEALED. 28 § 65. Subdivision 4 of section 27-1915 of the environmental conserva- 29 tion law is REPEALED. 30 § 66. Section 10-a of the highway law is REPEALED. 31 § 67. Section 10-e of the highway law is REPEALED. 32 § 68. Paragraph (y) of subdivision 1 of section 17 of the public offi- 33 cers law is REPEALED. 34 § 69. Section 89-c of the retirement and social security law is 35 REPEALED. 36 § 70. Paragraph v of subdivision 11 of section 98 of the state finance 37 law is REPEALED. 38 § 71. Subparagraph 7 of paragraph b of subdivision 2 of section 105 of 39 the state finance law is REPEALED. 40 § 72. Subdivision 2 of section 35 of the transportation law is 41 REPEALED. 42 § 73. Severability. If any provision or term of this act is for any 43 reason declared unconstitutional or invalid or ineffective by any compe- 44 tent jurisdiction, such decision shall not affect the validity of the 45 effectiveness of the remaining portions of this act or any part thereof. 46 § 74. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 47 law; provided, however that: 48 (a) The amendments to paragraph (b) of subdivision 11 of section 310 49 of the executive law made by section 15 of this act shall not affect the 50 repeal of such section and shall expire and be deemed repealed there- 51 with; 52 (b) The amendments to paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 92-r 53 of the state finance law made by section 39 of this act shall not affect 54 the repeal of such section and shall expire and be deemed repealed ther- 55 ewith; S. 2344 29 1 (c) The amendments to section 1180-e of the vehicle and traffic law 2 made by section 52 of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 3 section and shall expire and be deemed repealed therewith; and 4 (d) The amendments to subdivision 12 of section 1803 of the vehicle 5 and traffic law made by section 61 of this act shall not affect the 6 repeal of such subdivision and shall expire and be deemed repealed ther- 7 ewith.